District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.103

Foreign corporations — Application for certificate of authority; contents.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 221, ch. 269, § 103
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 242, Pub. L. 86-106, § 13
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(kk), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.103.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.4.
1973 Ed., § 29-933d.